Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1202.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 58ALONG-TERM INFECTIOUS DISEASE CONTROLINFECTIOUS DISEASE ADVISORY COMMISSIONSec.58A01. Definitions.58A02. Response to emergency.58A03. Inspection and review.58A04. Facilities.58A02. INFECTIOUS DISEASE ADVISORY COMMISSION . § 58A01. Definitions.<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced emergency medical technician." An advanced emergency medical technician as defined in section 8103 (relating to definitions)."Commission." The Infectious Disease Advisory Commission established under section 58A02(f) (relating to response to emergency)."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."COMMISSION." THE INFECTIOUS DISEASE ADVISORY COMMISSION ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 58A02 (RELATING TO INFECTIOUS DISEASE ADVISORY COMMISSION)."Disaster emergency." A declaration by the Governor of a disaster emergency under section 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor) relating to public health . DUE TO AN ACTUAL OR SUSPECTED OUTBREAK OF A CONTAGIOUS DISEASE, EPIDEMIC, PANDEMIC OR OTHER PUBLIC HEALTH OUTBREAK THAT AFFECTS THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF INDIVIDUALS WITHIN A FACILITY."Emergency medical technician." An emergency medical technician as defined in section 8103."Facility." Any of the following:(1) Domiciliary care as defined in section 2202-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) A personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(3) An assisted living residence as defined in section 1001 of the Human Services Code.20250HB1202PN2715 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Any of the following entities as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act:(i) Home care agency.(ii) Home care registry.(iii) Home health care agency.(iv) Hospice.(v) Long-term care nursing facility.(5) An older adult daily living center as defined in section 2 of the act of July 11, 1990 (P.L.499, No.118), known as the Older Adult Daily Living Centers Licensing Act.(6) A PACE provider as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395eee(a)(3) (relating to payments to, and coverage of benefits under, programs of all-inclusive care for elderly (PACE)).(7) Any other public or private organization, entity or part of a private organization or entity, that uses public funds and is paid, in part, to provide care to care-dependent individuals."Infectious disease coordinator." An employee of the facility designated to implement the infectious disease plan required under section 58A04 (relating to facilities)."Organization." An organization that supplies or manufactures personal protective equipment."Paramedic." A paramedic as defined in section 8103."Personal protective equipment" or "PPE." Gloves, hand sanitizer, respirators, face masks, gowns, face shields and other protective equipment designed to be worn or used by individuals to prevent or contain contact with, or to prevent transmission of, a communicable illness or the pathogens that cause communicable illness.20250HB1202PN2715 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Plan" or "infectious disease plan." The infectious disease plan required under section 58A04(a)."PPE stockpile" or "stockpile." The PPE stockpile established under section 58A02(b). A STOCKPILE OF PPE AS RECOMMENDED UNDER SECTION 58A02(B)(7)."Recipient." An individual who receives care, services or treatment in or from a facility."Relative." An individual who is related within the fifth degree of consanguinity or affinity to a recipient in a facility.§ 58A02. Response to emergency.(a) Selection of organization.--The Governor, or the Governor's designee, shall select an organization, by competitive bid, for successive terms of five years each to oversee the procurement, manufacturing and distribution of PPE in this Commonwealth.(b) Duties of selected organization.--The organization selected under subsection (a) shall perform the following duties:(1) Purchase and keep up-to-date a stockpile of PPE to be used by a facility in the event of a disaster emergency in accordance with subsection (c).(2) Select three manufacturers of PPE from which the organization shall procure PPE.(3) Contract with manufacturers of PPE to provide PPE to facilities within this Commonwealth and supply the PPE stockpile under paragraph (4). A manufacturer must be domiciled and manufacture PPE in this Commonwealth in order to be eligible for a contract under this paragraph.(4) Determine four locations within this Commonwealth to 20250HB1202PN2715 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 store PPE as follows:(i) One-fourth of the stockpile shall be located in the northwest area of this Commonwealth.(ii) One-fourth of the stockpile shall be located in the northeast area of this Commonwealth.(iii) One-fourth of the stockpile shall be located in the southwest area of this Commonwealth.(iv) One-fourth of the stockpile shall be located in the southeast area of this Commonwealth.(c) Required amount of PPE.--The amount of PPE stored in the stockpile shall be determined by the Governor, or the Governor's designee, the first year. For each subsequent year, the PPE stored in the stockpile shall equal the amount of PPE purchased the previous year at a minimum, but may not be more than quadruple the volume.(d) Funding of stockpile.--The stockpile shall be funded by a 50% fee on purchased PPE until the required amount of PPE stored in the stockpile under subsection (c) is met. For subsequent PPE stored in the stockpile, the fee shall be reduced to 7% to fund the stockpile operations. Facilities shall purchase all PPE from the organization. The amount that each facility purchases is the amount that will be available to the facility during a disaster emergency. (e) Access to PPE.--A facility, advanced emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician or paramedic may access the stockpile to obtain the PPE purchased by the facility for the stockpile during a disaster emergency.(f) Infectious Disease Advisory Commission.--(1) The Governor shall establish the Infectious Disease Advisory Commission.20250HB1202PN2715 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The commission shall be composed of the following members:(i) The Secretary of Aging or a designee.(ii) The Secretary of Health or a designee.(iii) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(iv) Six members knowledgeable and experienced in issues relating to operations in facilities as follows:(A) Three members of the Senate, appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate, in consultation with the Majority Leader of the Senate and the Minority Leader of the Senate.(B) Three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, in consultation with the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(v) Three members appointed by the Governor as follows:(A) One member shall be a member of the general public.(B) One member shall be a member of an organization who is directly involved in managing a facility.(C) One member shall be a member of an advocacy or services organization who is directly involved in providing services to older adults.(3) The commission shall meet as necessary, but no fewer than three times within the first 90 days of the disaster emergency.(4) The commission shall be responsible for examining 20250HB1202PN2715 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and analyzing the practices, processes and procedures relating to the prevention of and response to infectious diseases in facilities.(5) The commission shall develop best practices on disease prevention, education, training requirements and any other operations that may be altered for facilities during a disaster emergency.§ 58A03. Inspection and review.(a) Inspections and surveys.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall:(1) Review and align all facility inspections and surveys conducted by each department with best practices for reducing the spread of infectious diseases.(2) Determine the priority order for inspecting or surveying facilities during an infectious disease outbreak.(3) Determine a list of protocols for inspection and intervention.(b) Regulation review.--The Governor shall submit a report to the General Assembly reviewing all regulations for facilities. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) An outline of the regulations for facilities.(2) A comparison of the regulations for facilities that existed prior to a declaration of a disaster emergency and any regulations that were suspended or altered during the state of disaster emergency.(3) An executive summary of the differences between the regulations for facilities as determined under paragraph (2).(c) Data reporting.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall develop a single 20250HB1202PN2715 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reporting system for facilities to submit new cases and information that the department determines necessary during a disaster emergency.(d) Sample infectious disease plan.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall develop and make available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a sample infectious disease plan for a facility to implement. The model infectious disease plan shall fulfill the requirement under section 58A04(a) (relating to facilities). At a minimum, the infectious disease plan shall include:(1) The data reporting requirements under subsection (c).(2) A mechanism for complaints or feedback regarding the infectious disease plan.(3) A method to obtain a one-year supply of PPE from the organization under section 58A02(a) (relating to response to emergency).(4) A method to cohort recipients within the facility.(5) A method to screen each employee before the employee's shift begins.(6) A schedule that assigns staff to certain areas of the facility.(7) A notification system to alert relatives of recipients in the facility of the measures the facility is taking to prevent and respond to the communicable disease or virus.§ 58A04. Facilities.(a) Infectious disease plan.--Each facility shall develop an infectious disease plan to implement upon the declaration of a 20250HB1202PN2715 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disaster emergency. At a minimum, the infectious disease plan shall include the requirements listed under section 58A03(d) (relating to inspection and review). Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent a facility from taking additional measures to prevent and respond to an infectious or communicable disease during a disaster emergency.(b) Infectious disease coordinator.--Each facility shall designate an employee to serve as the infectious disease coordinator within the facility during a disaster emergency to ensure that the infectious disease plan requirements under subsection (a) are met.§ 58A02. INFECTIOUS DISEASE ADVISORY COMMISSION.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--(1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL ESTABLISH THE INFECTIOUS DISEASE ADVISORY COMMISSION.(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL BE COMPOSED OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:(I) THE SECRETARY OF AGING OR A DESIGNEE.(II) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH OR A DESIGNEE.(III) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES OR A DESIGNEE.(IV) THE DIRECTOR OF THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY OR A DESIGNEE.(V) SIX MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WHO SHALL SERVE FOR THE LEGISLATIVE SESSION IN WHICH THE MEMBER IS APPOINTED AS FOLLOWS:(A) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE OF THE SENATE.(B) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE.(C) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER 20250HB1202PN2715 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE SENATE.(D) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(E) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(F) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(VI) FIVE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WHO SHALL SERVE FOR A TWO-YEAR TERM AS FOLLOWS:(A) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE A PHYSICIAN LICENSED TO PRACTICE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH WHO SPECIALIZES IN INFECTIOUS DISEASES.(B) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE A MEMBER OF AN ORGANIZATION WHO IS DIRECTLY INVOLVED IN MANAGING A FACILITY.(C) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE A MEMBER OF AN ADVOCACY OR SERVICES ORGANIZATION WHO IS DIRECTLY INVOLVED IN PROVIDING SERVICES TO OLDER ADULTS.(D) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE AN EXPERT IN SUPPLY SIDE MANAGEMENT OR LOGISTICS OF PPE.(E) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE A MEDICAL DIRECTOR OF A FACILITY.(3) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY APPOINTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(V) MAY CONTINUE TO SERVE BEYOND THE SESSION IN WHICH THE MEMBER WAS APPOINTED PROVIDED THE MEMBER REMAINS A MEMBER OF THE LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS IN WHICH THE MEMBER WAS INITIALLY APPOINTED, UNTIL THAT MEMBER IS REPLACED.(4) MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE APPOINTED WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH. THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AS NECESSARY TO FULFILL THE 20250HB1202PN2715 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REQUIREMENTS OF THIS CHAPTER AND NO FEWER THAN THREE TIMES WITHIN THE FIRST 90 DAYS OF A DISASTER EMERGENCY. THE COMMISSION MAY CONDUCT MEETINGS VIRTUALLY.(5) A VACANCY SHALL BE FILLED BY THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE VACANCY.(B) DUTIES OF COMMISSION.--THE COMMISSION SHALL:(1) BE RESPONSIBLE FOR EXAMINING AND ANALYZING THE PRACTICES, PROCESSES AND PROCEDURES RELATING TO THE PREVENTION OF AND RESPONSE TO INFECTIOUS DISEASES IN FACILITIES.(2) DEVELOP BEST PRACTICES ON DISEASE PREVENTION, EDUCATION, TRAINING REQUIREMENTS AND ANY OTHER OPERATIONS THAT MAY BE ALTERED FOR FACILITIES DURING A DISASTER EMERGENCY.(3) ADVISE THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, WITHIN 48 HOURS OF A REQUEST, REGARDING STEPS TO TAKE TO ENSURE THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF INDIVIDUALS WITHIN FACILITIES DURING A DISASTER EMERGENCY.(4) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON HOW STATE AGENCIES MAY COORDINATE INFORMATION AND RESOURCES RELATING TO THE EMERGENCY DECLARATION TO COUNTIES WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(5) DEVELOP A SAMPLE INFECTIOUS DISEASE PLAN THAT A FACILITY MAY IMPLEMENT, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE:(I) A METHOD TO OBTAIN A ONE-YEAR SUPPLY OF PPE FROM AVAILABLE RESOURCES.(II) A METHOD TO IDENTIFY AND GROUP RECIPIENTS WITHIN THE FACILITY.(III) A METHOD TO SCREEN EACH EMPLOYEE BEFORE THE EMPLOYEE'S SHIFT BEGINS.20250HB1202PN2715 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (IV) A SCHEDULE THAT ASSIGNS EMPLOYEES TO CERTAIN AREAS OF THE FACILITY.(V) A NOTIFICATION SYSTEM TO ALERT RELATIVES OF RECIPIENTS OF THE MEASURES THE FACILITY IS TAKING TO PREVENT AND RESPOND TO THE DISASTER EMERGENCY.(VI) ANY OTHER INFORMATION OR RECOMMENDATIONS THE COMMISSION DEEMS NECESSARY.(6) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR LEGISLATION OR REGULATIONS TO IMPROVE THE COMMONWEALTH'S PREPAREDNESS FOR, RESPONSE OF AND ACTIONS TAKEN DURING A DISASTER EMERGENCY. THE COMMISSION SHALL COMPARE REGULATIONS FOR FACILITIES THAT EXISTED PRIOR TO A DECLARATION OF A DISASTER EMERGENCY AND ANY REGULATIONS THAT WERE SUSPENDED OR ALTERED DURING THE DISASTER EMERGENCY.(7) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS RELATING TO THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A COMMONWEALTH PPE STOCKPILE, INCLUDING:(I) PROCEDURES FOR PROCUREMENT OF A PPE STOCKPILE.(II) THE AMOUNT AND TYPES OF PPE NEEDED FOR USE BY FACILITIES AND OTHER PERSONS DURING A DISASTER EMERGENCY.(III) USE OF PRIVATE VENDORS VERSUS STATE AGENCIES, OR A COMBINATION THEREOF, INCLUDING THE IDENTIFICATION OF DOMESTIC VENDORS.(IV) WAREHOUSING AND UPKEEP OF THE PPE STOCKPILE, INCLUDING LOCATIONS THROUGHOUT THIS COMMONWEALTH TO STORE THE PPE STOCKPILE.(V) AN ANALYSIS OF THE ESTIMATED COSTS OF CREATING, MAINTAINING AND STORING A PPE STOCKPILE, INCLUDING FUNDING SOURCES AND HOW THE PPE STOCKPILE WILL BE FINANCIALLY MAINTAINED.(VI) CONSIDERATIONS RELATING TO THE EXPIRATION OF PRODUCTS AND SUPPLIES IN THE PPE STOCKPILE.20250HB1202PN2715 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (VII) PERSONS WHO SHALL BE ABLE TO USE THE PPE STOCKPILE DURING A DISASTER EMERGENCY.(VIII) HOW SUPPLIES FROM THE PPE STOCKPILE WILL BE DISTRIBUTED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING PRIORITY DISTRIBUTION TO CERTAIN PERSONS, IF APPLICABLE.(IX) LEGISLATION THAT MAY BE NEEDED TO EFFECTUATE A PPE STOCKPILE.(8) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS RELATING TO ACCESS TO RECIPIENTS WITHIN A FACILITY BY RELATIVES AND ANY OTHER INDIVIDUALS.(9) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS AND PROVIDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION AS DEEMED NECESSARY.(C) REPORT.--THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A REPORT RELATING TO THE DUTIES UNDER SUBSECTION (B) WITHIN 24 MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION. THE REPORT SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE GOVERNOR AND SHALL BE POSTED ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE STATE AGENCIES REPRESENTED ON THE COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION SHALL UPDATE THE REPORT AS NEEDED, BUT AT LEAST ONCE EVERY SEVEN YEARS.(D) COMPENSATION.--MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES BUT SHALL RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR REASONABLE TRAVEL AND OTHER NECESSARY EXPENSES IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE DUTIES.(E) CHAIR.--THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT ONE MEMBER AS CHAIR AND ONE MEMBER AS VICE CHAIR WHO SHALL SERVE FOR A PERIOD OF TWO YEARS.(F) STAFF SUPPORT.--THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL PROVIDE STAFF SUPPORT TO THE COMMISSION AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH.20250HB1202PN2715 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) DUTIES OF STATE AGENCIES.--STATE AGENCIES SHALL, AS PERMITTED BY LAW, COOPERATE AND PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE COMMISSION FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF THE COMMISSION'S DUTIES.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 90 days.20250HB1202PN2715 - 14 - <--1234